Utah statutes.
63A-5-401.   Rulemaking for sale of real property -- Licensed or certified appraisers -- Exceptions.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, if the division buys, sells, or exchanges real property, the division shall make rules to ensure that the value of the real property is congruent with the proposed price and other terms of the purchase, sale, or exchange.

(2)  The rules:

(a)  shall establish procedures for determining the value of the real property;

(b)  may provide that an appraisal, as defined under Section 61-2g-102, demonstrates the real property's value; and

(c)  may require that the appraisal be completed by a state-certified general appraiser, as defined under Section 61-2g-102.

(3)  Subsection (1) does not apply to the purchase, sale, or exchange of real property, or to an interest in real property:

(a)  that is under a contract or other written agreement before May 5, 2008; or

(b)  with a value of less than $100,000, as estimated by the state agency.



Amended by Chapter 289, 2011 General Session

